New York, session 2025-2026, S4363.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 139-f of the state finance law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. Any contractor who subcontracts and/or has a joint venture with 4 minority and women-owned businesses on a public work project and prior 5 to completion of such project the contractor ceases its contractual 6 relationship with any to all minority and women-owned businesses, such 7 contractor shall report such change in relationship to the public owner 8 of such project and the division of minority and women's business devel- 9 opment. Failure to report within seven calendar days shall result in a 10 fine determined by the director of the division of minority and women's 11 business development. 12 § 2. Section 106-b of the general municipal law is amended by adding 13 a new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 14 4. Any contractor who subcontracts and/or has a joint venture with 15 minority and women-owned businesses on a public work project and prior 16 to completion of such project the contractor ceases its contractual 17 relationship with any to all minority and women-owned businesses, such 18 contractor shall report such change in relationship to the public owner 19 of such project and the division of minority and women's business devel- 20 opment. Failure to report within seven calendar days shall result in a 21 fine determined by the director of the division of minority and women's 22 business development. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05643-01-5